Hawaii statutes.
§353-31 Revolving funds for correctional
facility stores. Subject to the approval of the department of budget and
finance, a special revolving fund for each correctional facility store may be
established for the purpose of purchasing items to be resold to inmates. All
moneys received from the resale of allowable items in correctional facility
stores shall be deposited in the revolving fund for each such store. The
proceeds of each fund shall be expended at the discretion of the director, but
shall be used only for purchasing items to be resold to inmates and for
purchasing of other goods or services for inmate benefits and needs. [L 1987, c
338, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next